dev/apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
<pardef n="/karawA_WA__tam">
	<e><p><l>karawIM_WIM</l><r>yA_karawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>karawIM_WIM</l><r>yA_karawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>karawIM_WIM</l><r>yA_karawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>karawI_WI</l><r>yA_karawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>karawI_WI</l><r>yA_karawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>karawI_WI</l><r>yA_karawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>karawe_We</l><r>yA_karawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>karawe_We</l><r>yA_karawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>karawe_We</l><r>yA_karawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>karawA_WA</l><r>yA_karawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>karawA_WA</l><r>yA_karawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>karawA_WA</l><r>yA_karawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/yA__tam">
	<e><p><l>KAIM</l><r>_yA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KAIM</l><r>_yA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KAIM</l><r>_yA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KAI</l><r>_yA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KAI</l><r>_yA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KAI</l><r>_yA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KAye</l><r>_yA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KAye</l><r>_yA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KAye</l><r>_yA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KAyA</l><r>_yA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KAyA</l><r>_yA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>KAyA</l><r>_yA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/WA__tam">
	<e><p><l>WIM</l><r>yA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_WA_</l><r>yA_WA_<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>WIM</l><r>yA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_WA_</l><r>yA_WA_<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>WIM</l><r>yA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_WA_</l><r>yA_WA_<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>WI</l><r>yA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_WA_</l><r>yA_WA_<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>WI</l><r>yA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_WA_</l><r>yA_WA_<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>WI</l><r>yA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_WA_</l><r>yA_WA_<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/WA__tam">
	<e><p><l>We</l><r>yA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_WA_</l><r>yA_WA_<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>We</l><r>yA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_WA_</l><r>yA_WA_<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>We</l><r>yA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_WA_</l><r>yA_WA_<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>WA</l><r>yA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_WA_</l><r>yA_WA_<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>WA</l><r>yA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_WA_</l><r>yA_WA_<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>WA</l><r>yA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>yA_WA_</l><r>yA_WA_<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/binA__tam">
	<e><p><l>ye_binA</l><r>ye_binA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ye_binA</l><r>ye_binA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ye_binA</l><r>ye_binA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ye_binA</l><r>ye_binA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ye_binA</l><r>ye_binA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ye_binA</l><r>ye_binA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ye_binA</l><r>ye_binA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ye_binA</l><r>ye_binA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ye_binA</l><r>ye_binA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ye_binA</l><r>ye_binA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ye_binA</l><r>ye_binA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ye_binA</l><r>ye_binA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="anek/a__adj">
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="amIra/__adj">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bAlikA/__adj">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bAlaka/__adj">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ajAwI/__adj">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kAl/A__adj">
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>				

<e lm="wA_WA"><i></i><par n="/WA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="yA_karawA_WA"><i></i><par n="/karawA_WA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="_yA"><i></i><par n="/yA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="yA_WA"><i></i><par n="/WA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="yA_WA"><i></i><par n="/WA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="ye_binA"><i></i><par n="/binA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="akarwavya"><i>akarwavya</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="AlasI"><i>AlasI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="alpabuxXi"><i>alpabuxXi</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="alpAyu"><i>alpAyu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="amoGaxqRti"><i>amoGaxqRti</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="amqwyu"><i>amqwyu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="amUrwi"><i>amUrwi</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anabyAhA"><i>anabyAh</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anAraBya"><i>anAraBya</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aneka"><i>anek</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anekAkI"><i>anekAkI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anuhAri"><i>anuhAri</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="apakqRta"><i>apakqRta</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="apawi"><i>apawi</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="apraBu"><i>apraBu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="apriyavAxI"><i>apriyavAxI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="areNu"><i>areNu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="arjunacCavi"><i>arjunacCavi</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="asaMKya"><i>asaMKya</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aSvArUDa"><i>aSvArUD</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avaswu"><i>avaswu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avaXI"><i>avaXI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="AviRta"><i>AviRta</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aXakacarA"><i>aXakacar</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ayogI"><i>ayogI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ayoni"><i>ayoni</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="Ayukwa"><i>Ayukwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="baDiyA"><i>baDiyA</i><par n="bAlikA/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bAlaka"><i>bAlaka</i><par n="bAlaka/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bAlikA"><i>bAlikA</i><par n="bAlikA/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="barPIlA"><i>barPIl</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="BAvI"><i>BAvI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="boxXA"><i>boxX</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="BqSa"><i>BqSa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="brahmayoni"><i>brahmayoni</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="buxXivAxI"><i>buxXivAxI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ciwakabarA"><i>ciwakabar</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="devaDA"><i>devaD</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ESa"><i>ESa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ewAxqSI"><i>ewAxqSI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gIlI"><i>gIlI</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hawaSrI"><i>hawaSrI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hEMgiMga"><i>hEMgiMga</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="IsavI"><i>IsavI</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="jaKamI"><i>jaKamI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kaI"><i>kaI</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kAlAkalUtA"><i>kAlAkalUt</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kAmakAjI"><i>kAmakAjI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kApAla"><i>kApAla</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="korA"><i>kor</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kqRijIvI"><i>kqRijIvI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kuCa"><i>kuC</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lavaNa"><i>lavaNa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="majAkiyA"><i>majAkiy</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mAyAvI"><i>mAyAvI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mImAMsya"><i>mImAMsya</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mITA"><i>mIT</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nirUpya"><i>nirUpya</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nukIlA"><i>nukIl</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pakRapAwI"><i>pakRapAwI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="PalAz"><i>PalAz</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="parivarjanIya"><i>parivarjanIya</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prakASAwmA"><i>prakASAwm</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prapaMcI"><i>prapaMcI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ramawA"><i>ramaw</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="Rataka"><i>Rataka</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="saMkocakArI"><i>saMkocakArI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sapwa"><i>sapwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sarvavewwA"><i>sarvaveww</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sIXI"><i>sIXI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tUtIPUtI"><i>tUtIPUtI</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="upalakRiwa"><i>upalakRiwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="viGnakArI"><i>viGnakArI</i><par n="ajAwI/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="wqwIyA"><i>wqwIy</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="xAruNa"><i>xAruNa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
